Utah statutes.
70A-9a-202.   Title to collateral immaterial.
Except as otherwise provided with respect to consignments or sales of
accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes, the
provisions of this chapter with regard to rights and obligations apply whether
title to collateral is in the secured party or the debtor.
